Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
ORGANIZATION, GENERALLY

§26-1 Office of the lieutenant governor.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the lieutenant governor is designated
the secretary of state for intergovernmental relations and shall perform the
duties and functions heretofore exercised by the secretary of Hawaii. The duties
and functions shall include but not be limited to recordation of all
legislative and gubernatorial acts, certification of state documents, and
maintenance of an official file of rules adopted by state departments as
provided in chapter 91. The lieutenant governor may employ staff as necessary
without regard to chapter 76.

(b) The lieutenant governor, with the approval
of the governor, may designate some other officer of the government of the State
to authenticate documents on behalf of the lieutenant governor during the
lieutenant governor's temporary absence outside the State or during the
lieutenant governor's illness whenever the documents require the signature of
the lieutenant governor. The person shall affix the person's own signature to
the document with the words, "for the lieutenant governor" following
and the signature shall be deemed to satisfy the requirement of the lieutenant
governor's signature on the document. The designation and approval shall be in
writing and shall be filed in the office of the governor and a copy thereof,
certified by the governor, shall be filed with the public archives. The person
designated shall serve without additional compensation and the lieutenant governor
shall be responsible and liable on the lieutenant governor's official bond for
all acts done by the person designated in the performance of the duties on
behalf of the lieutenant governor.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to authorize the person to exercise and discharge the powers and duties of the
office of the governor as provided by the first paragraph of article V, section
4, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. The person shall not be
authorized to exercise any powers whenever a successor to the lieutenant
governor assumes the duties of the lieutenant governor pursuant to article V,
section 4, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.

(d) The governor shall identify and direct
other duties as necessary to the lieutenant governor.

(e) A lieutenant governor whose
legal residence is on an island other than Oahu and who is required to remain
away from the island of the lieutenant governor's legal residence but within
the State overnight or longer while on official business shall receive an
allowance to cover personal expenses such as board, lodging, and incidental
expenses. The allowance authorized under this subsection shall be set at a
daily single rate to be determined by a joint agreement between the senate
president and speaker of the house of representatives. This rate shall:

(1) Not exceed the greater of the maximum allowance
for such expenses payable to any public officer or employee of the State; and

(2) Be reasonably calculated to cover the expenses
specified in this subsection.

(f) The allowance authorized under
subsection (e) shall be in addition to and shall not supplant any portion of
the salary of the lieutenant governor determined pursuant to section 26-51.
The allowance shall be paid out of any available appropriation made by the
legislature for expenses, other than the salary, of the lieutenant governor. [L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §9; am L 1963, c 30, §1; am L 1965, c 96, §10; Supp, §14A-8;
HRS §26-1; am L 1981, c 82, §5; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 213, §1; am L 1995, c
151, §2; am L Sp 1995, c 27, §§9, 15; am L 1998, c 137, §3; am L 1999, c 141,
§3; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2005, c 147, §1; am L 2013, c 51, §2; am L
2015, c 92, §1]

Note

Pacific-Asia institute for resilience and sustainability. L
2014, c 229.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next